Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 11 Corner Perpetuation and Filing Act [Renumbered]

§ 36-11-101.
[Amended and renumbered.]

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to citation of the “Corner Perpetuation and Filing Act,” see §

33-29-140

.

§ 36-11-102.
[Amended and renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as § 33-29-141 by Laws 1997, ch. 116, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to definitions see § 33-29-141.

§ 36-11-103.
[Amended and renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as § 33-29-142 by Laws 1997, ch. 116, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to completion of a “corner file,” see § 33-29-142.

§ 36-11-104.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as § 33-29-143 by Laws 1997, ch. 116, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to filing of corner record, see § 33-29-143.

§ 36-11-105.
[Amended and renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as § 33-29-144 by Laws 1997, ch. 116, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to information to be included in a corner file and form of a corner file, see § 33-29-144.

§ 36-11-106.
[Amended and renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as § 33-29-145 by Laws 1997, ch. 116, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to preservation of map records and public inspection, see § 33-29-145.

§ 36-11-107.
[Amended and renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as § 33-29-146 by Laws 1997, ch. 116, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to reconstruction or rehabilitation of a monument, see § 33-29-146.

§ 36-11-108.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as § 33-29-147 by Laws 1997, ch. 116, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to signatures required on corner records, see § 33-29-147.

§ 36-11-109.
[Amended and renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as § 33-29-148 by Laws 1997, ch. 116, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to previously existing corners, see § 33-29-148.

§ 36-11-110.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as § 33-29-149 by Laws 1997, ch. 116, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to exemption from filing fees, see § 33-29-149.